Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Notice to Apparent Owner of Property Presumed Abandoned

393A.270.
Notice to apparent owner by holder.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the holder of property presumed abandoned shall send to the apparent owner notice by first-class United States mail that complies with KRS

393A.280

in a format acceptable to the administrator not more than one hundred eighty (180) days nor less than sixty (60) days before filing the report under KRS

393A.220

if:

The holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner which the holder’s records do not disclose to be invalid and is sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner; and

The value of the property is fifty dollars ($50) or more.

If an apparent owner has consented to receive electronic-mail delivery from the holder, the holder shall send the notice described in subsection (1) of this section both by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner’s last-known mailing address and by electronic mail, unless the holder believes that the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address is invalid.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 27, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.280.
Contents of notice by holder.

Notice under KRS

393A.270

shall contain a heading that reads substantially as follows: “Notice. The Commonwealth of Kentucky requires us to notify you that your property may be transferred to the custody of the Kentucky State Treasurer if you do not contact us before (insert date that is thirty (30) days after the date of this notice).”

The notice under KRS

393A.270

shall:

Identify the nature and, except for property that does not have a fixed value, the value of the property that is the subject of the notice;

State that the property shall be turned over to the administrator;

State that after the property is turned over to the administrator, an apparent owner that seeks return of the property shall file a claim with the administrator;

State that property that is not legal tender of the United States may be sold by the administrator; and

Provide instructions that the apparent owner shall follow to prevent the holder from reporting and paying or delivering the property to the administrator.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 28, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.290.
Notice by administrator.

The administrator shall give notice to an apparent owner that property presumed abandoned and appears to be owned by the apparent owner shall be held by the administrator under this chapter.

In providing notice under subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall:

Not be required to use newspaper publication to provide notice; and

Maintain a Web site or database accessible by the public and electronically searchable that contains the names reported to the administrator of all apparent owners for whom property is being held by the administrator.

The Web site or database maintained under subsection (2)(b) of this section shall include instructions for filing with the administrator a claim to property and a printable claim form with instructions for its use.

In addition to giving notice under subsection (2) of this section, the administrator may use printed publication, telecommunication, the Internet, or other media to inform the public of the existence of unclaimed property held by the administrator.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 29, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.300.
Cooperation among state officers and agencies to locate apparent owner.

Unless prohibited by law other than this chapter, on request of the administrator, each officer, agency, board, commission, division, and department of this state, any body politic and corporate created by this state for a public purpose, and each political subdivision of this state shall make its books and records available to the administrator and cooperate with the administrator to determine the current address of an apparent owner of property held by the administrator under this chapter.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 30, effective July 14, 2018.